Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10D-604] Report to
contract owners. For annuities in the payout period with changes in
non-guaranteed elements, and for the accumulation period of a deferred annuity,
the insurer shall at least annually provide each contract owner with a report
of the status of the contract that contains at least the following information:

(1) The beginning and ending dates of the current
report period;

(2) The accumulation and cash surrender value, if
any, at the end of the previous report period and at the end of the current
report period;

(3) The total amounts, if any, that have been
credited, charged to the contract value, or paid during the current report
period; and

(4) The amount of outstanding loans, if any, as of
the end of the current report period. [L 2006, c 71, pt of §1]

Revision Note

Subsection designation deleted pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next